Massachusetts, session 194th, S1778.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Massachusetts General Laws Chapter 90B Section 25 as appearing in the 2022 edition is
hereby amended by inserting at the end the following:-
"Provided that the Registry of Motor Vehicles shall provide registration and regulation
for the allowance of recreational vehicles to be used on public roads and ways if such vehicles
are owned and operated by Police or Fire departments for emergency response, provided further
the Registry shall provide specialty plates denoting such vehicles as being owned and operated
by Police or Fire departments."
of 1